tortoisesvn/ext/spell/lt_LT.aff
SFX Q čias    tesnio          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniam         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnį           čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniu          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniame        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesni           čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnių          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniems        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnius         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniais        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniuose       čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnė           čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnės          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnei          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnę           čias      
SFX Q čias    tesne           čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnėje         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnėms         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnes          čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnėmis        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnėse         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnysis        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniojo        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniajam       čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnįjį         čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniuoju       čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniajame      čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnieji        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniųjų        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniesiems     čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniuosius     čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniaisiais    čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniuosiuose   čias      
SFX Q čias    tesnioji        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniosios      čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniajai       čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniąją        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniąja        čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniojoj       čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniojoje      čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniosioms     čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniąsias      čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniosiomis    čias      
SFX Q čias    tesniosiose     čias      
SFX Q džias   desnis          džias     
SFX Q džias   desnio          džias     
SFX Q džias   desniam         džias     
SFX Q džias   desnį           džias     
SFX Q džias   desniu          džias     
SFX Q džias   desniame        džias     
SFX Q džias   desni           džias     
SFX Q džias   desnių          džias     
SFX Q džias   desniems        džias     
SFX Q džias   desnius         džias     
SFX Q džias   desniais        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniuose       džias     
SFX Q džias   desnė           džias     
SFX Q džias   desnės          džias     
SFX Q džias   desnei          džias     
SFX Q džias   desnę           džias     
SFX Q džias   desne           džias     
SFX Q džias   desnėje         džias     
SFX Q džias   desnėms         džias     
SFX Q džias   desnes          džias     
SFX Q džias   desnėmis        džias     
SFX Q džias   desnėse         džias     
SFX Q džias   desnysis        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniojo        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniajam       džias     
SFX Q džias   desnįjį         džias     
SFX Q džias   desniuoju       džias     
SFX Q džias   desniajame      džias     
SFX Q džias   desnieji        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniųjų        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniesiems     džias     
SFX Q džias   desniuosius     džias     
SFX Q džias   desniaisiais    džias     
SFX Q džias   desniuosiuose   džias     
SFX Q džias   desnioji        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniosios      džias     
SFX Q džias   desniajai       džias     
SFX Q džias   desniąją        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniąja        džias     
SFX Q džias   desniojoj       džias     
SFX Q džias   desniojoje      džias     
SFX Q džias   desniosioms     džias     
SFX Q džias   desniąsias      džias     
SFX Q džias   desniosiomis    džias     
SFX Q džias   desniosiose     džias     
SFX Q us      esnis           us        
SFX Q us      esnio           us        
SFX Q us      esniam          us        
SFX Q us      esnį            us        
SFX Q us      esniu           us        
SFX Q us      esniame         us        
SFX Q us      esni            us        
SFX Q us      esnių           us        
SFX Q us      esniems         us        
SFX Q us      esnius          us        
SFX Q us      esniais         us        
SFX Q us      esniuose        us        
SFX Q us      esnė            us        
SFX Q us      esnės           us        
SFX Q us      esnei           us        
SFX Q us      esnę            us        
SFX Q us      esne            us        
SFX Q us      esnioje         us        
SFX Q us      esnėms          us        
SFX Q us      esnes           us        
SFX Q us      esnėmis         us        
SFX Q us      esnėse          us        
SFX Q us      esnysis         us        
SFX Q us      esniojo         us        
SFX Q us      esniajam        us        
SFX Q us      esnįjį          us        
SFX Q us      esniuoju        us        
SFX Q us      esniajame       us        
SFX Q us      esnieji         us        
SFX Q us      esniųjų         us        
SFX Q us      esniesiems      us        
SFX Q us      esniuosius      us        
SFX Q us      esniaisiais     us        
SFX Q us      esniuosiuose    us        
SFX Q us      esnioji         us        
SFX Q us      esniosios       us        
SFX Q us      esniajai        us        
SFX Q us      esniąją         us        
SFX Q us      esniąja         us        
SFX Q us      esniojoj        us        
SFX Q us      esniojoje       us        
SFX Q us      esniosioms      us        
SFX Q us      esniąsias       us        
SFX Q us      esniosiomis     us        
SFX Q us      esniosiose      us        
SFX Q is      ėlesnis         is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnio         is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniam        is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnį          is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniu         is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniame       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesni          is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnių         is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniems       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnius        is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniais       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniuose      is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnė          is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnės         is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnei         is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnę          is        
SFX Q is      ėlesne          is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnėje        is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnėms        is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnes         is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnėmis       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnėse        is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnysis       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniojo       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniajam      is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnįjį        is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniuoju      is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniajame     is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnieji       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniųjų       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniesiems    is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniuosius    is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniaisiais   is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniuosiuose  is        
SFX Q is      ėlesnioji       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniosios     is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniajai      is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniąją       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniąja       is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniojoj      is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniojoje     is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniosioms    is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniąsias     is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniosiomis   is        
SFX Q is      ėlesniosiose    is        
SFX Q ys      ėlesnis         ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesnio         ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesniam        ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesnį          ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesniu         ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesniame       ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesni          ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesnių         ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesniems       ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesnius        ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesniais       ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesniuose      ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesnė          ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesnės         ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesnei         ys        
SFX Q ys      ėlesnę          ys        
